South Dakota, session 2026, HB1041.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of the Military may contract for the construction, completion,
furnishing, equipping, and maintenance of the expansion and renovation of the Sturgis
Readiness Center, including heating, plumbing, water, sewer, electric facilities, architectural
and engineering services, and any other services or actions necessary for this purpose.
Section 2. There is appropriated $2,350,000 from the general fund and $8,000,000 in federal
fund expenditure authority, to the Department of the Military, for the purposes authorized in
section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. The administration of the design and construction of the project authorized in this
Act shall be under the general charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration as provided in chapter 5-14.
Section 4. The adjutant general of the Department of the Military shall approve vouchers and
the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated by June
30, 2031, shall revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.578.12 2 1041
An Act to authorize the expansion and renovation of the Sturgis Readiness Center, to make
an appropriation therefor, and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1041
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1041 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1041 ENROLLED